ko: 철물 > 도구 > 펜치: 잠금 펜치; 바늘코 펜치; 슬립조인트 펜치
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Kliešte: Samosvorné kliešte; Špicaté kliešte; Kliešte na klzné spoje
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > ペンチ: ロッキングプライヤー; ラジオペンチ; スリップジョイントプライヤー
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Tänger: Låstänger; Spetstänger; Rörtänger
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Клещи: Клещи тип чираци; Зегер клещи; Комбинирани клещи
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Pinze da ferramenta: Pinze di bloccaggio; Pinze ad ago; Pinze per giunti scorrevoli
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Klešče: Zaskočne klešče; Koničaste klešče; Klešče z nastavljivim zglobom
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Kìm: Kìm bấm chết; Kìm mỏ nhọn; Kìm mũi trượt
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Replės: Fiksuojamos replės; Replės ilgomis žiaunomis; Replės reguliuojamomis žiaunomis
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Pinces: Pince de verrouillage; Pinces à long bec; Pince à joint coulissant
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Alicates: Alicate de pressão; Alicate de ponta fina; Alicate ajustável
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Kerpetenler: Kilitleme Kerpetenleri; İğne-Kargaburun; Kayma Ortak Pensesi
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Zangen: Feststellzangen; Spitzzangen; Slip-Joint-Zangen
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 钳子: 锁紧钳; 尖嘴钳; 鲤鱼钳
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Kombinerki: Szczypce zaciskowe; Szczypce szpiczaste z przecinakiem; Szczypce nastawne
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Fogók: Zárófogók; Tűfogók; Állítható fogók
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Плоскогубцы и пассатижи: Пассатижи с фиксатором; Узкогубцы; Переставные плоскогубцы
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Tenger: Låsetenger; Nåle-nesetenger; Sklileddetang
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Clești: Clești de blocare; Clești cu vârf subțire; Clești tip papagal
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Πένσα: Πένσες ασφάλισης; Πένσες ηλεκτρολόγου; Πένσες με ένωση ολίσθησης
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Kleště: Samosvorné kleště; Kleště s dlouhými čelistmi; Kleště na kluzné spoje
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Alicates: Alicates de bloqueo; Alicates de punta de aguja; Alicates para juntas deslizantes
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Grijptangen: Standaard grijptangen; Puntgrijptangen; Scharniergrijptangen
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > คีม: คีมล็อค; คีมปากแหลม; คีมปากขยาย
en: Hardware > Tools > Pliers: Locking Pliers; Needle-Nose Pliers; Slip Joint Pliers
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Alicates: Alicate de trava; Alicate de ponta fina; Alicate para juntas deslizantes
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Tænger: Låsetænger; Nålenæsetænger; Glidledtænger
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 鉗: 鎖緊鉗; 尖嘴鉗; 滑口鉗
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Kliješta: Kliješta s blokadom; Šiljasta kliješta; Kliješta s kliznim čeljustima
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Pihdit: Lukkopihdit; Teräväkärkiset pihdit; Liukunivelpihdit